src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3PIEHAIN  !!≈ * **@CODE@** to v1 3PIEHAINonly and v2 3PIEHANJ 
 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:in^CLEN^RLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:in^CLEN^RLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:n^SVSH%>ij Rhash ; 

+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:njá 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; !njuámmilâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:njá 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !njuámmilâš 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:n CPXsuff ;                    ! piehânjâm 
+N+Sg+Gen:in CPXsuff ;                   ! piehânjân 
+N+Sg+Acc:in CPXsuff ;                   ! piehâinân 
+N+Sg+Nom:nj CPXsuff ;                   ! piehânjâm 
+N+Sg+Gen:nj CPXsuff ;                   ! piehânjân 
+N+Sg+Acc:nj CPXsuff ;                   ! piehâinân 
+N+Sg+Ill:nj%>ân CPXsuff ;               ! piehânjnân, tubdânjânân 
+N+Sg+Loc:nj%>ist CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjistân, tubdânjistân 
+N+Sg+Com:nj%>áin CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjáinân, tubdânjáinân 
+N+Ess:nj%>in CPXsuff ;                  ! piehânjnân, tubdânjnân 
+N+Pl+Nom:n%>ijd CPXsuff ;               ! piehânjijdân 
+N+Pl+Nom:nj%>ijd CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjijdân 
+N+Pl+Gen:nj%>ijd CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:nj%>ijd CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjijdân 
+N+Pl+Ill:nj%>ijd CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjijdân 
+N+Pl+Loc:nj%>ijn CPXsuff ;              ! piehânjijnân 
+N+Pl+Com:nj%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;           ! piehânjijdânguin 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:nj^CLEN^RLEN^SVSH%> Rhash ; ! in use? 
+N+Sg+Nom:nj CPXsuff ;                   ! piehânjâm 
+N+Sg+Gen:nj CPXsuff ;                   ! piehânjân 
+N+Sg+Acc:nj CPXsuff ;                   ! piehânjân 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN^RLEN%>in K ;     ! piehâin 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN^RLEN%>nj K ;     ! piehânj NB! Remove SVSH?? 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CLEN^RLEN%>in K ;     ! piehâin 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CLEN^RLEN%>nj K ;     ! piehânj 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CLEN^RLEN%>in K ;     ! piehâin 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CLEN^RLEN%>nj K ;     ! piehânj 
+N+Sg+Ill:n%>ân K ;              ! piehânân, tubdânân 
+N+Sg+Ill:nj%>ân K ;             ! piehânjân, tubdânjân 
+N+Sg+Loc:n%>ist K ;             ! piehânist, tubdânist 
+N+Sg+Loc:nj%>ist K ;            ! piehânjist, tubdânjist 
+N+Sg+Com:n%>áin K ;             ! piehânjáin, tubdânjáin 
+N+Sg+Com:nj%>áin K ;            ! piehânjáin, tubdânjáin 
+N+Sg+Abe:^CLEN^RLEN%>inttáá K ; ! piehâinttáá, tubdânjttáá 
+N+Sg+Abe:^CLEN^RLEN%>njttáá K ; ! piehâinttáá, tubdânjttáá 
+N+Ess:n%>in K ;                 ! piehânjin, tubdânjin 
+N+Par:n%>id K ;                 ! piehânjid 
+N+Ess:nj%>in K ;                ! piehânjin, tubdânjin 
+N+Par:nj%>id K ;                ! piehânjid 

+N+Pl+Nom:n%>eh K ;              ! piehâneh 
+N+Pl+Nom:nj%>eh K ;             ! piehâneh 
+N+Pl+Gen:n%>ij K ;              ! piehânij 
+N+Pl+Gen:nj%>ij K ;             ! piehânij 
+N+Pl+Acc:n%>ijd K ;             ! piehânijd 
+N+Pl+Acc:nj%>ijd K ;            ! piehânijd 
+N+Pl+Ill:n%>áid K ;             ! piehânáid 
+N+Pl+Ill:nj%>áid K ;            ! piehânáid 
+N+Pl+Loc:n%>ijn K ;             ! piehânáid 
+N+Pl+Loc:nj%>ijn K ;            ! piehânáid 
+N+Pl+Com:n%>ij GUIN ;           ! piehânnijguin 
+N+Pl+Com:nj%>ij GUIN ;          ! piehânjijguin 
+N+Pl+Abe:n%>ijttáá K ;          ! piehânijttáá 
+N+Pl+Abe:nj%>ijttáá K ;         ! piehânijttáá 
 
 
LEXICON 3JAAVVIL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
3JAAVVIL_SG ; 
3JAAVVIL_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 3JAAVVIL_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_JAAVVIL_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SLEN%> Rhash ; 
 
LEXICON 3JAAVVIL_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:^CSH X_eh_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^CSH%>ij Rhash ; 
 
 
LEXICON X_JAAVVIL_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^WG^CLEN^RLEN K ;  ! jäävvil 
+Sg+Gen:^SLEN K ;          ! jáhháál 
+Sg+Acc:^SLEN K ;          ! jáhháál 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>ân K ;       ! jáhálân 
+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist K ;      ! jáhálist 
+Sg+Com:^CSH%>áin K ;      ! jáháláin 
+Sg+Abe:^SLEN%>ttáá K ;    ! jáhháálttáá 
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in K ;      ! jävilin  jáhálin 
+Par:^WG^RVSH%>id K ;      ! jävilid jáhálid 
+Ess:^CSH%>in K ;          ! pápárin 
+Par:^CSH%>id K ;          ! pápárid 
 
+Ess:^RLEN%>n CPXsuff ;    ! 
+Sg+Nom:^CSH%>â VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+Sg+Nom:^CSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  !        
+Sg+Gen:^CSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+Sg+Acc:^CSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+Sg+Gen:^CSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+Sg+Acc:^CSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
 
+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>st CPXsuff ;        
+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>s CPXsuff ;        
+Sg+Com:^CSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;        ! 
 
+Pl+Loc:^CSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Gen:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Acc:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Ill:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Com:^CSH%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
LEXICON 3TERES !!≈ * **@CODE@** = ki5ällás^ÁE
3PAAVIR_PL ; 
+N: X_PAAVIR_not_Nom_Par_SG ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG^RVSH K ;        ! teres 
+N+Par:^CSH%>id K ;        ! pápárid 
+N+Par+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>id K ;        ! pápárid 
+N+Ess+Use/NG:^CSH%>in K ;        ! pápárid 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N:^WG^RLEN%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:^SLEN%> Gen_DER ; 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CSH^RVSH%>â VPXsuff12nom ;     ! pápárâm 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CSH^RVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;         ! pápáris 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH^RVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;        ! pápárân 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH^RVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH^RVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;         ! pápáris 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH^RVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>st CPXsuff ;             ! pááppárstis 
+N+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:^CSH^RVSH%>ist CPXsuff ; ! pápáristis 
+N+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>s CPXsuff ;              ! pááppársis 
+N+Sg+Com:^CSH^RVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijnân 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CSH^RVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijnân 
+N+Pl+Gen:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijdân 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijdân 
+N+Pl+Com:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;     ! pápárijdânguin 
 
 
LEXICON 3PAAVIR !!≈ * **@CODE@** NGA+Abe blank, WG Ess, CSH for the rest 
3PAAVIR_SG ; 
3PAAVIR_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_PAAVIR !!≈ * **@CODE@** NGA+Abe blank, WG Ess, CSH for the rest 
X_PAAVIR_SG ; 
:^CSH X_eh_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 3PAAVIR_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_PAAVIR_SG ; 
+N+Ess:^CSH%>in K ;             ! pápárin 
+N+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>n CPXsuff ;    ! pävirnân 
+N+Par:^CSH%>id K ;             ! pápárid 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N:^WG^RLEN%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:^SLEN%> Gen_DER ; 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CSH^RVSH%>â VPXsuff12nom ;     ! pápárâm 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CSH^RVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;         ! pápáris 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH^RVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;        ! pápárân 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH^RVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;        
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH^RVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;         ! pápáris 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH^RVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;         
+N+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>st CPXsuff ;             ! pááppárstis 
+N+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:^CSH^RVSH%>ist CPXsuff ; ! pápáristis 
+N+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>s CPXsuff ;              ! pááppársis 
+N+Sg+Com:^CSH^RVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijnân 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CSH^RVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijnân 
+N+Pl+Gen:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijdân 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijdân 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;        ! pápárijdân 
+N+Pl+Com:^CSH^RVSH%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;     ! pápárijdânguin 
 
 
LEXICON 3PAAVIR_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** plural forms 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^CSH%>ij Rhash ; 
+N:^CSH X_eh_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_PAAVIR_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** NGA+Abe blank, WG Ess, CSH for the rest 
+Par:^WG^RVSH%>id K ;        ! pävirid 
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN K ;        ! päävir 
X_PAAVIR_not_Nom_Par_SG ; 
 
LEXICON X_PAAVIR_not_Nom_Par !!≈ * **@CODE@** NGA+Abe blank, WG Ess, CSH for the rest 
X_PAAVIR_not_Nom_Par_SG ; 
:^CSH   X_eh_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_PAAVIR_not_Nom_Par_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Gen:^SLEN K ;       ! pááppár 
+Sg+Acc:^SLEN K ;       ! pááppár 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>ân K ;    ! pápárân 
+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist K ;   ! pápárist 
+Sg+Com:^CSH%>áin K ;   ! pápáráin 
+Sg+Abe:^SLEN%>ttáá K ; ! pááppárttáá 
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in K ;   ! pävirin 
 
