src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
herttâmäälis+Sem/Food:herttâ#máállás^ÁI 3PAAVIR "" ;
sälttipiättâr+Sem/Plant:sältti#piätt5âr 3PAAVIR "" ;
riddoviemmâr+Sem/Dummytag:riddo#viemm5âr 3PAAVIR "rantatörmä" ;
röntgensuonjâr+Sem/Dummytag:röntgen#suonnjâr 3PAAVIR "röntgensäde" ;
čuovâsuonjâr+Sem/Dummytag:čuovâ#suonnjâr 3PAAVIR "valonsäde" ;
noomin+Sem/Dummytag:noomin 3PAAVIR "nomini" ;
lodenaver+Sem/Dummytag:lode#nahha^SVr^ÁE 3PAAVIR "koiranuni" ;
salpiättâr+Sem/Dummytag:salpiätt5âr 3PAAVIR "salpietari" ;
árvupäävir+Sem/Dummytag:árvu#páápp4ár^ÁI 3PAAVIR "arvopaperi" ;
tuáhtár+Err/Lex+Sem/Hum:tuávtir 3PAAVIR "tohtori" ;
tuubdâin+Sem/Dummytag:tuubdâ 3PIEHAIN "anturi" ;
mietikieđâkeevâd+Sem/Dummytag:mieti#kieđâ#keevvâd 3PAAVIR "myötäkäyminen" ;
vyestikeevâd+Sem/Dummytag:vyesti#keevvâd 3PAAVIR "vastoinkäyminen" ;
kuulmâčievâg+Sem/Dummytag:kuulmâ#čievvâg 3PAAVIR "kolmio" ;
neeljičievâg+Sem/Dummytag:neelji#čievvâg 3PAAVIR "nelikulmio" ;
muštos+Sem/Dummytag:muštos 3PAAVIR "muistio" ;
peivimäälis+Sem/Food:peivi#máállás^ÁI 3PAAVIR "lounas" ;
lones+Sem/Dummytag:lonná^SVs^ÁE 3PAAVIR "korvaus" ;
poccuujáháleh+Sem/Dummytag:poccuu#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL_PL "poronjäkälät" ;
persovnpápáreh+Sem/Dummytag:persovn#pápár 3PAAVIR_PL "henkilöpaperit" ;
suohisfuođâr+Sem/Dummytag:suohis#fuođâr 3PAAVIR "väkirehu" ;
päniruuggâin+Err/Lex+Sem/Dummytag:päni#ruuggâi4n 3PIEHAIN "hammastikku" ;
kaaggânj+Sem/Dummytag:ka^RVg^RCâ 3PIEHAIN ;
pikkánj+Sem/Dummytag:pik^RCá 3PIEHAIN ;
kooppânj+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVp^RCâ 3PIEHAIN ;
kooppâin+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVp^RCâ 3PIEHAIN ;
čieppâin+Sem/Dummytag:čiep^RCâ 3PIEHAIN ;
suoppânj+Sem/Dummytag:suop^RCâ 3PIEHAIN ;
vuolâin+v1+Sem/Dummytag:vuolâ 3PIEHAIN ;
vuolâin+v2+Sem/Dummytag:vuolâ 3PIEHAIN ;
koorânj+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVrâ 3PIEHAIN ;
njuođâin+v1+Sem/Dummytag:njuođâ 3PIEHAIN ;
kaaggâin+Sem/Dummytag:ka^RVg^RCâi4n 3PIEHAIN ;
koorâin+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVrâi4n 3PIEHAIN ;
kááruin+Sem/Dummytag:ká^RVrui4n 3PIEHAIN ;
kááttunj+Sem/Dummytag:ká^RVt^RCu 3PIEHAIN ;
mááidunj+Sem/Dummytag:má^RVi4du 3PIEHAIN ;
káárunj+Sem/Dummytag:ká^RVru 3PIEHAIN ;
kááttuin+Sem/Dummytag:ká^RVttu 3PIEHAIN ;
soves+Sem/Dummytag:sohhá^SVs^ÁE 3PAAVIR ;
läämis+Sem/Dummytag:láámmás^ÁI 3PAAVIR ;
čievâg+Sem/Dummytag:čievvâg 3PAAVIR ;
čuolân+Sem/Dummytag:čuollân 3PAAVIR ;
viemâr+Sem/Dummytag:viemmâr 3PAAVIR ;
iiŋas+Sem/Dummytag:iiŋas 3PAAVIR ;
teres+Sem/Dummytag:tiärrás^ÁE 3TERES ;
piehânj+v2+Sem/Ani-bird:piehâ 3PIEHAIN ;
fuođâr+Sem/Food:fuođâr 3PAAVIR ; ! D X V	! tags_via_apertium
jäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "jäkälä" ;
keđgijäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:keđgi#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "kiventiera" ;
kieles+Sem/Semcon:ki5ällás^ÁE 3TERES ; ! YAML  tags_via_apertium
kiäruin+Sem/Ani-bird:kiäru 3PIEHAIN ;
kollepiäippáin+Sem/Ani-bird:kolle#piäi4ppá 3PIEHAIN "tikli" ;
kuolbâjäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:kuolbâ#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "keräporonjäkälä" ;
kuolbâtanejäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:kuolbâ#tane#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "kangastinajäkälä" ;
kääniores+Sem/Ani-bird:kääni#orrá^SVs^ÁE 3PAAVIR ;
njäävvil+Sem/Body:njá^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL ; ! VV XX V	! tags_via_apertium
ores+Sem/Ani:orrá^SVs^ÁE 3PAAVIR ; ! V X V	! tags_via_apertium
piehâin+Sem/Ani-bird:piehâ 3PIEHAIN "piekana" ; ! YAML tags_via_apertium
pikkáin+Sem/Hum:pik^RCái4n 3PIEHAIN ; !	! tags_via_apertium
piäippáin+Sem/Ani-bird:piäi4ppá 3PIEHAIN ;
poccuujäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:poccuu#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "" ;
ruánzijäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:ruánzi#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "sormijäkälä" ;
ruánáápiäippáin+Sem/Ani-bird:ruánáá#piäi4ppá 3PIEHAIN ; 
ruŋgojäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:ruŋgo#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "runkojäkälä" ;
ränisjäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:ränis#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "" ;
sevtiljäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:sevtil#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "valkoporonjäkälä" ;
sonjojäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:sonjo#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "karvejäkälä" ;
soorvâjäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:soorvâ#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "isohirvenjäkälä" ;
suormâtuolbâjäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:suormâ#tuolbâ#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "sormipaisukarve" ;
suptâjäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:suptâ#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "mietoporonjäkälä" ;
säggičuárvijäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:säggi#čuárvi#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "okatorvijäkälä" ;
uáivijäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:uáivi#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "harmaaporonjäkälä" ;
vielgisjäävvil+Sem/Plant-fungus:vielgis#já^RVhhá^SVl^ÁI 3JAAVVIL "" ;
